Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5063YH (3) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2432 Section 1. Section 156.1, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Providing natural reduction services. 3 Sec. 2. Section 156.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 4 following new subsections: 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âNatural reductionâ means the 6 contained, accelerated conversion of human remains to soil. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 7B. âNatural reduction establishmentâ means 8 a secure structure, room, or other space within a funeral 9 establishment or on the property of a funeral establishment 10 which provides any service related to natural reduction. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 156.6 Natural reduction services. 12 1. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 13 17A for the provision of natural reduction services by 14 funeral directors and the licensure of natural reduction 15 establishments. The rules shall include a minimum setback 16 distance of five hundred feet between a natural reduction 17 establishment and any drinking water source. 18 2. The board shall inform each funeral director who operates 19 a natural reduction establishment of cemeteries that are able 20 to receive naturally reduced human remains pursuant to section 21 523I.18. 22 Sec. 4. Section 156.14, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 23 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 24 A person shall not establish, conduct, or maintain a 25 funeral establishment , a natural reduction establishment, or a 26 cremation establishment in this state without a license. The 27 license shall be identified as an establishment license. 28 Sec. 5. Section 156.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 2. The board shall specify by rule the licensing procedures 31 to be followed, including specifications of forms for use in 32 applying for an establishment license and fees for filing 33 an application. The board shall specify by rule minimum 34 standards for professional responsibility in the conduct of a 35 -1- LSB 5063YH (3) 91 ss/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 2432 funeral establishment , a natural reduction establishment, or a 1 cremation establishment. 2 Sec. 6. Section 156.14, subsection 3, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 To qualify for a funeral establishment , a natural reduction 5 establishment, or a cremation establishment license, the 6 applicant shall submit to the board a license fee as determined 7 by the board and a completed application on a form prescribed 8 by the board that shall include the following information and 9 be given under oath: 10 Sec. 7. Section 156.15, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. A funeral establishment , a natural reduction 13 establishment, or cremation establishment shall not be operated 14 until a license or renewal certificate has been issued to the 15 establishment by the board. 16 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 523I.318 Interment of naturally 17 reduced remains. 18 1. The commissioner shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 19 17A for the interment of naturally reduced remains at a 20 cemetery. A cemetery that does not comply with rules adopted 21 pursuant to this subsection shall not inter naturally reduced 22 remains. 23 2. The commissioner shall inform the board of mortuary 24 science of each cemetery that is in compliance with rules of 25 the commissioner regarding the interment of naturally reduced 26 remains and has expressed interest in receiving naturally 27 reduced remains. 28 3. For the purposes of this section, ânaturally reduced 29 remainsâ means human remains that have undergone natural 30 reduction as defined in section 156.1. 31 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027, 32 except that the board of mortuary science and commissioner of 33 insurance may adopt rules for implementation of this Act prior 34 to that date. 35 -2- LSB 5063YH (3) 91 ss/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 2432